Wyoming, session 2026, HB0022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-11-107 is created to read:

15-11-107. Recall of officers.

(a) Any municipal officer elected under this article
may be removed at any time by the qualified electors
through petition in the following manner:

HB0022

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0066
(i) The petition shall be signed by at least
twenty-five percent (25%) of all the registered electors
and demanding an election of a successor of the person
sought to be removed shall be filed with the city clerk;

(ii) The petition shall contain a general
statement of the grounds for removal;

(iii) The signatures to the petition need not
all be appended to one (1) paper, but each signer shall add
to his signature his place of residence, giving the street
and number;

(iv) One (1) of the signers of each paper shall
make oath before a competent officer that the statements
therein made are believed to be true, and that each
signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name
it purports to be;

(v) Within ten (10) days from the date of filing
the petition the clerk shall determine whether or not the
petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified
HB0022

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0066
electors. If necessary, the governing body shall provide
the clerk additional assistance for that purpose;

(vi) The clerk shall attach to the petition his
certificate, showing the result of his examination;

(vii) If the petition is insufficient, it shall
be returned to the person who filed it, without prejudice
to the filing of a new petition to the same effect;

(viii) If the petition is sufficient, the clerk
shall submit it to the governing body without delay. The
governing body shall then fix a date for holding the
election, not less than thirty (30) days and not more than
forty (40) days from the date of the clerk's certificate of
sufficiency;

(ix) The governing body shall publish notice and
arrange for holding the election, which shall be conducted
in the same manner as other city elections.

(b) Any person sought to be removed may be a
candidate to succeed himself, and unless he requests
HB0022

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0066
otherwise in writing at least ten (10) days prior to the
date of the special primary election, the clerk shall place
his name on the official ballot without nomination. On the
second Tuesday preceding the date fixed for the special
election, a special primary election for the selection of
candidates shall be held. The special primary election and
nomination are governed by the provisions of this article.
If the person sought to be removed is a candidate, one (1)
opposing candidate shall be selected at the special primary
election. The special primary election shall be held if
there are more than two (2) nominees. If there are no
candidates nominated against the officer sought to be
removed, no special election will be held and the incumbent
shall continue in office.

(c) In any removal special election the candidate
receiving the highest number of votes is elected. The
incumbent shall be removed from office upon the
qualification of his successor, who shall hold office
during the unexpired portion of the term for which his
predecessor was elected. If the person who receives the
highest number of votes fails to qualify within ten (10)
days after receiving notification of election the office is
HB0022

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0066
vacant. This method of removal is in addition to any other
methods provided by law.

Section 2. W.S. 15-4-110 is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0022